src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AY_STEM_2_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - k̲áy - ENGLISH : # CLASS_AY_STEM_2

     k̲áy+V+Interr+Past: k̲áayaa
     k̲áy+V+Indir+Past: k̲áayaan
     k̲áy+V+Rel+Evid: k̲áayaas
     k̲áy+V+Past+NonFact: k̲áayaa.ang
     k̲áy+V+Cert+Pres: k̲áayʼahlanggang
     k̲áy+V+Cert+Past: k̲áayʼahlanggan
     k̲áy+V+Cert+Past+Hab: k̲áayʼahlanggiinii
     k̲áy+V+Cert+Rel: k̲áayʼahlans
     k̲áy+V+Ints+Past: k̲áayaaʼahlang
     k̲áy+V+Cont: k̲áayaaʼahlanggaa
     k̲áy+V+Ctfact+Pres: k̲áayaaʼahlanggang
     k̲áy+V+Rflx: k̲áayʼahl
